Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1622
Officers; liable for debts and obligations; when.

Every president, treasurer, general manager, agent, or other person exercising the powers of such office of any corporation, joint-stock company, or other association, who has himself, in its behalf, knowingly violated, united to violate, or consented to the violation of the provisions of section 59-1603, 59-1604, or 59-1605, shall thereafter be personally liable for all debts and obligations of any such corporation, joint-stock company, or other association created while such person holds such office or agency and which were incurred in the furtherance of that violation.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 29.